test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s18_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - krevja: # 
    krevja+V+Inf: krevja
    krevja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: krevur
    krevja+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: kravdi
    krevja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: kravdu
    krevja+V+Sup: kravt
    krevja+V+PrfPrc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: kravdur
